Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.190

Poisoning animals—Penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime of poisoning animals if the person intentionally or knowingly poisons an animal under circumstances which do not constitute animal cruelty in the first degree.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to euthanizing by poison an animal in a lawful and humane manner by the animal's owner, or by a duly authorized servant or agent of the owner, or by a person acting pursuant to instructions from a duly constituted public authority.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the reasonable use of rodent or pest poison, insecticides, fungicides, or slug bait for their intended purposes. As used in this section, the term "rodent" includes but is not limited to Columbia ground squirrels, other ground squirrels, rats, mice, gophers, rabbits, and any other rodent designated as injurious to the agricultural interests of the state as provided in *chapter 17.16 RCW. The term "pest" as used in this section includes any pest as defined in RCW 17.21.020.

(4) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 111; 1994 c 261 s 13; 1941 c 105 s 1; RRS s 3207-1. Formerly RCW 16.52.150, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 17.16 RCW was repealed by 1994 c 11 s 1.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.